Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-806
Destroying bridge or landmark; penalty.

If any person shall knowingly, willfully, and maliciously demolish, cut down or destroy any private, public or toll bridge, cut, fell, deface, alter, remove or destroy any landmark, corner or bearing tree, witness trench and pits or witness pits, properly established, the person so offending shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

G.S.1873, §§ 58, 99, p. 743;

R.S.1913, § 3003;

Laws 1915, c. 59, § 1, p. 153;

C.S.1922, § 2755;

C.S.1929, § 39-841;

R.S.1943, § 39-806;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 208.

Damaging or obstructing bridge, penalties, see sections 39-303 and 39-304.